West Virginia, session 2026, HB5266.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Contracts with Managed Care Organizations or Related Entities. All West Virginia Medicaid managed care organizations shall contract with any willing hospital, doctor, behavioral health provider, or other provider to provide services in a Medicaid region if the provider is willing to accept the payments and terms offered comparable providers. Any provider that meets all applicable Medicaid enrollment, professional and business licensing requirements set by law and regulation, has a Medicaid provider number, and meets all managed care organizations’ credentialing requirements for similar providers, and is not otherwise disqualified from participating in Medicare or Medicaid, shall be designated as an approved provider.